North Carolina, session 2025, SB447.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Establishment; Purpose. – The Sewer Repair Task Force (Task
Force) is established. The purpose of the Task Force is (i) to review and assess the current state
of wastewater infrastructure in the State, (ii) to develop strategies and plans for the effective
implementation of wastewater treatment projects, for addressing existing challenges and barriers
to project financing and construction, and for addressing future needs within the State, and (iii)
to identify funding mechanisms, including potential contributions from industrial wastewater
discharges, to support wastewater infrastructure development.
SECTION 1.(b) Task Force. – The Task Force shall consist of 18 members,
appointed as follows:
(1) Four members of the House of Representatives upon the recommendation of
the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom shall be a member
of the minority party.
(2) Four members of the Senate upon the recommendation of the President Pro
Tempore of the Senate, one of whom shall be a member of the minority party.
(3) The Director of the Division of Water Infrastructure of the Department of
Environmental Quality or the Director's designee, ex officio and nonvoting.
(4) The Director of the Local Government Commission or the Director's designee,
ex officio and nonvoting.
(5) Four county commissioners, who are advisory and nonvoting, one of whom is
appointed upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, one of whom is appointed upon the recommendation of the
Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, one of whom is appointed
upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and
one of whom is appointed upon the recommendation of the Minority Leader
of the Senate.
*S447-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Four representatives of a local government wastewater entity, who are
advisory and nonvoting, one of whom is appointed upon the recommendation
of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of whom is appointed
upon the recommendation of the Minority Leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom is appointed upon the recommendation of the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and one of whom is appointed upon the
recommendation of the Minority Leader of the Senate. For purposes of this
act, a local government wastewater entity is any of the following:
a. A water and sewer authority created pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter
162A of the General Statutes.
b. A metropolitan sewerage district created pursuant to Article 5 of
Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.
c. A metropolitan water and sewerage district created pursuant to Article
5A of Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.
d. A county water and sewer district created pursuant to Article 6 of
Chapter 162A of the General Statutes.
e. A sanitary district created pursuant to Part 2 of Article 2 of Chapter
130A of the General Statutes that is providing wastewater collection
or treatment services.
f. A joint agency created pursuant to Part 1 or Part 5 of Article 20 of
Chapter 160A of the General Statutes that is providing wastewater
collection or treatment services.
SECTION 1.(c) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall each appoint a cochair of the Task Force from among its
membership.
SECTION 1.(d) The Task Force shall meet upon the call of its cochairs. A quorum
of the Task Force is a majority of its members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote
at a meeting at which a quorum is present. The Task Force, while in the discharge of its official
duties, may exercise all powers provided for under G.S. 120-19 through G.S. 120-19.4. The Task
Force may contract for professional, clerical, or consultant services, as provided by
G.S. 120-32.02. If the Task Force hires a consultant, the consultant shall not be a State employee
or a person currently under contract with the State to provide services. Members of the Task
Force shall receive per diem, subsistence, and travel allowances as provided in G.S. 120-3.1. The
expenses of the Task Force shall be considered expenses incurred for the joint operation of the
General Assembly.
SECTION 1.(e) In conducting this study, the Task Force shall consult with
representatives of the Department of Commerce, the Economic Development Partnership of
North Carolina, the Utilities Commission, and the Golden LEAF Foundation.
SECTION 1.(f) The Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and
clerical staff to assist the Task Force in its work. The Director of Legislative Assistants of the
House of Representatives and the Director of Legislative Assistants of the Senate shall assign
clerical support to the Task Force.
SECTION 1.(g) Meetings of the Task Force are authorized to begin on or after July
1, 2025. The Task Force shall submit a final report on the results of its study, including proposed
legislation, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and
Economic Resources on or before December 1, 2026, by filing a copy of the report with the
Office of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Office of the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and
Economic Resources, and the Legislative Library. The Task Force shall terminate on December
1, 2026, or upon the filing of its final report, whichever comes first.
Page 2 Senate Bill 447-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. The sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality to provide a grant to the South Granville Water and Sewer Authority to
be allocated as follows:
(1) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for expansion of wastewater facilities
serving Creedmoor and Butner.
(2) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to upgrade wastewater treatment
facilities to meet new federal standards for PFAS.
(3) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for water meter modernization.
(4) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) for replacement of lead pipes to comply with
new federal requirements.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2025. The remainder of this act
is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 447-First Edition Page 3